New York, session 2025-2026, S5985.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 304 of the laws of 2023, amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing an occupancy tax in the town of Skanea- 3 teles, is amended to read as follows: 4 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to 5 contracts entered into on or after such date; provided, however, that 6 the provisions of this act shall expire December 31, [2025] 2027, when 7 upon such date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10408-01-5